District of Columbia statutes.
26-1216

Registered agent.

(a)

Each association or savings and loan holding company making an application to the Superintendent [Commissioner] under § 26-1202 or § 26-1203 shall include in that application a statement identifying a registered agent and registered office for the association or savings and loan holding company. The registered agent shall be an agent of the association or savings and loan holding company upon whom process may be served. All notices or demands required or permitted by law may be served upon the registered agent. The registered agent and office may be the same as that used by the District association or District savings and loan holding company sought to be acquired. The appointment of a registered agent for purposes of this section shall meet the requirements imposed on a foreign corporation’s appointment of a registered agent and office by § 29-101.106.

(b)

If the association or savings and loan holding company fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent and office in the District, the Mayor shall serve as the agent of the association or savings and loan holding company upon whom any process, notice, or demand against the association or savings and loan holding company may be served. All matters served upon the Mayor pursuant to this section shall be handled in the same manner as matters served upon the Mayor on behalf of foreign corporations pursuant to § 29-101.108(b) and (d).

(c)

The appointment of a registered agent pursuant to this section may not be revoked or modified, except that a new registered agent may be substituted, as long as any liability for the penalties imposed by this chapter remains outstanding against the association or savings and loan holding company. Upon satisfaction of any liability, the appointment may be revoked or otherwise modified, unless the association or savings and loan holding company is otherwise required by law to maintain the registered agent and office.

Oct. 12, 1988, D.C. Law 7-175, § 17, 35 DCR 6133
1981 Ed., § 26-916.